Illinois, session 104th, HB3933.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 7purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the 8ordinary and contingent expenses of the Department of 9Innovation and Technology:10PAYABLE FROM THE GENERAL REVENUE FUND11  For Personal Services............................29,858,70012  For State Contributions to Social Security........2,284,20013  Total                                           $32,142,900 14    Section 5. The sum of $257,000,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 16Fund to the Department of Innovation and Technology for 17administrative and program expenses, including prior years' 18costs. 19    Section 10. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 21Fund to the Department of Innovation and Technology for all   HB3933- 2 -OMB104 00031 LAH 10031 b1costs associated with the Cybersecurity Liaison Program. 2    Section 15. The sum of $718,869,700, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the Technology 4Management Revolving Fund to the Department of Innovation and 5Technology for administrative and program expenses, including 6prior years' costs. 7    Section 20. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the DoIT Special 9Projects Fund to the Department of Innovation and Technology 10for all ordinary and contingent expenses related to 11information technology within the powers and duties of the 12Department. 13    Section 25. The sum of $25,000,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the DoIT Special 15Projects Fund to the Department of Innovation and Technology 16for all ordinary and contingent expenses related to addressing 17cybersecurity risks and cybersecurity threats as authorized by 18Section 70612 of the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, 19(IIJA) and any associated federal guidance. 20    Section 30. The amount of $20,000,000, or so much thereof 21as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Personal 22Property Tax Replacement Fund to the Department of Innovation   HB3933- 3 -OMB104 00031 LAH 10031 b1and Technology for all costs associated with the Illinois 2Century Network and broadband projects. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 42025.